California statutes. Education Code
(2) Within 20 calendar days of the operative date of the act that added this section, a list of postsecondary educational institutions operating in the state that have indicated, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), that they will comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(f) Within 15 calendar days of the department posting the application template pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), a local educational agency serving high school pupils shall post a notice on its internet website and provide written notice to its pupils and their parents or guardians of the grade change option described in subdivision (b). The notice shall include all of the following:

(1) The application to request a grade change.

(2) The list of postsecondary educational institutions described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).

(3) A statement that some postsecondary educational institutions, including those in other states, may not accept a Pass or No Pass grade instead of a letter grade for admission purposes.

(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), an application described in subdivision (b) shall be submitted to the pupil’s local educational agency within 15 calendar days of the local educational agency, pursuant to subdivision (f), posting a notice on its internet website and providing written notice to its pupils and their parents or guardians.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an application that has been submitted under subdivision (b)
 to the pupil’s local educational agency after the deadline described in paragraph (1) shall be accepted by the local educational agency pursuant to subdivision (c) if the application is received by the pupil’s local educational agency on or before October 1, 2021.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), a local educational agency may accept an application submitted under subdivision (b) after October 1, 2021, for the 2020–21 school year.

(h) A local educational agency shall change a transcript pursuant to subdivision (c) and shall notify the pupil and the pupil’s parent or guardian of the change within 15 calendar days of receiving the pupil’s application pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 252, Sec. 22.   (AB 167)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

49067.

(a) The governing board of each school district shall prescribe regulations requiring the evaluation of each pupil’s achievement for each marking period and requiring a conference with, or a written report to, the parent of each pupil whenever it becomes evident to the teacher that the pupil is in danger of failing a course. The refusal of the parent to attend the conference, or to respond to the written report, shall not preclude failing the pupil at the end of the grading period.

(b) The governing board of any school district may adopt regulations authorizing a teacher to assign a failing grade to any pupil whose absences from the teacher’s class that are not excused pursuant to Section 48205 equal or exceed a maximum number which shall be specified by the board. Regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A reasonable opportunity for the pupil or the pupil’s parent or guardian to explain the absences.

(2) A method for identification in the pupil’s record of the failing grades assigned to the pupil on the basis of excessive unexcused absences.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 49061, the provisions of this section shall apply to the parent or guardian of any pupil without regard to the age of the pupil.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 846, Sec. 20.   Effective September 25, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

49068.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the academic record of a transferring pupil is essential to the pupil’s placement, academic success, and timely graduation. The Legislature further finds and declares that an accurate, updated pupil record enhances school safety, academic achievement, and pupil welfare when the record of a transferring pupil includes transcripts, immunization records, and, when applicable, suspension notices, expulsion records, and individualized education programs.

(b) If a pupil transfers from one public school to another or to a private school, or transfers from a private school to a public school within the state, the pupil’s
 permanent record or a copy of it shall be transferred by the former public school or private school no later than 10 schooldays following the date the request is received from the public school or private school where the pupil intends to enroll.

(c) As used in this section, “schoolday” means a day upon which the school is in session or nonholiday weekdays during the summer break.

(d) A public school requesting a transfer of a record pursuant to this section shall notify the parent of his or her right to receive a copy of the record and a right to a hearing to challenge the content of the record.

(e) The state board may adopt rules and regulations concerning the transfer of records.

(f) Nothing in this section shall supersede any other state or federal law governing the transfer of pupil records for specific pupil populations, including, but not limited to, Sections 49069.5 and 56043.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 369, Sec. 1.   (AB 1799)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

49068.5.

Upon the initial enrollment of a pupil in a public or private elementary school, or whenever an elementary school pupil transfers from one school district to another, transfers to an elementary school within the same district, transfers from one private elementary school to another, transfers from a private elementary school to a public elementary school, or transfers from a public elementary school to a private elementary school, the principal of the school that the child enters or to which he or she transfers is urged to check to see if the child resembles a child listed as missing by the bulletins provided by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 14204 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 437, Sec. 2.   (SB 1066)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

49068.6.

(a) Any law enforcement agency responsible for the investigation of a missing child shall inform the school district, other local educational agency, or private school, in which the child is enrolled, that the child is missing. The notice shall be in writing, shall include a photograph of the child if a photograph is available, and shall be given within 10 days of the child’s disappearance.

(b) Every school notified pursuant to this section shall place a notice that the child has been reported missing on the front of each missing child’s school record. For public schools this shall be in addition to the posting requirements set forth in Section 38139.

(c) Local law enforcement agencies may establish a process for informing local schools about abducted children pursuant to this section.

(d) If a school receives a record inquiry or request from any person or entity for a missing child about whom the school has been notified pursuant to this section, the school shall immediately notify the law enforcement authorities who informed the school of the missing child’s status.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 832, first Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

49069.3.

(a) A foster family agency with jurisdiction over a currently enrolled or former pupil, a short-term residential treatment program staff responsible for the education or case management of a pupil, and a caregiver who has direct responsibility for the care of the pupil, including a certified or licensed foster parent, an approved relative or nonrelated extended family member, or a resource family, as defined in Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, may access the current or most recent records of grades, transcripts, attendance, discipline, and online communication on platforms established by schools for pupils and parents, and any
 individualized education programs (IEP) that may have been developed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 56300) of Part 30 or any plan adopted pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)) maintained by school districts, county offices of education, charter schools, nonpublic schools, as defined in Section 60010, or private schools of that pupil. A caregiver, pursuant to this section, may access the information specified in this section regardless of whether the caregiver has been appointed as the pupil’s educational rights holder pursuant to Section 319, 361, or 726 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) A foster family agency, short-term residential treatment program, or caregiver may review and receive pupil records pursuant to subdivision (a) for purposes of monitoring the pupil’s educational
 progress, updating and maintaining the pupil’s education records as required by Section 16010 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and ensuring the pupil has access to educational services, supports, and activities. These purposes include, but are not limited to, enrolling the pupil in school, assisting the pupil with homework, class assignments, and college and scholarship applications, and enrolling the pupil in extracurricular activities, tutoring, and other afterschool and summer enrichment programs.

(c) (1) If direct communication between a caregiver and an educational rights holder is appropriate, a caregiver who is not the pupil’s educational rights holder shall notify the pupil’s educational rights holder of any educational needs of the pupil that require the educational rights holder’s consent or participation,
 including, but not limited to, school placement decisions, decisions on whether to invoke or waive school of origin rights, consent for special education assessments and individualized education programs, meetings or hearings regarding attendance or discipline, and decisions regarding graduation. In instances involving significant discipline or that potentially impact a pupil’s continued enrollment and progress in school, the caregiver shall also provide the same information to the pupil’s social worker as is provided to the educational rights holder.

(2) If direct communication between a caregiver and an educational rights holder is inappropriate, the pupil’s social worker shall direct the caregiver to communicate the information specified in paragraph (1) with the pupil’s social worker or attorney instead of the educational rights
 holder.

(3) Nothing in this subdivision affects the responsibilities of a placement agency with regard to the education of a pupil.

(4) This subdivision shall not be construed to alter or increase a social worker’s or attorney’s decisionmaking rights and responsibilities regarding a pupil.

(d) Nothing in this section affects the duties of a local educational agency related to informing and involving educational rights holders in educational decisions affecting the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 829, Sec. 2.   (SB 233)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

49069.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The mobility of pupils in foster care often disrupts their educational experience.

(2) Efficient transfer procedures and transfer of pupil records are critical factors in the swift placement of foster children in educational settings.

(3) Pupils who have had contact with the juvenile justice system are often denied credit or partial credit earned during enrollment in juvenile court schools. Delays in school enrollment and loss of earned credit can result in improper class or school placement, denial
 of special education services, and school dropout.

(b) The proper and timely transfer between schools of pupils in foster care is the responsibility of both the local educational agency, including the county office of education for pupils in foster care who are enrolled in juvenile court schools, and the county placing agency, which includes the county probation department.

(c) As soon as the county placing agency or county office of education becomes aware of the need to transfer a pupil in foster care out of the pupil’s current school, the county placing agency or county office of education shall contact the appropriate person at the local educational agency of the pupil. The county placing agency shall notify the local educational agency of the date that the pupil will be
 leaving the school and request that the pupil be transferred out.

(d) Upon receiving a transfer request from a county placing agency or notification of enrollment from the new local educational agency, the local educational agency receiving the transfer request or notification shall, within two business days, transfer the pupil out of school and deliver the educational information and records of the pupil to the next educational placement.

(e) As part of the transfer process described under subdivisions (c) and (d), the local educational agency shall compile the complete educational record of the pupil, including a determination of days of enrollment or seat time, or both if applicable, an official transcript
 that meets the requirements of Section 51225.2, including full and partial credits earned, or any measure of full or partial coursework being satisfactorily completed, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 51225.2, including a determination of the days of enrollment or seat time, 
 current classes and grades, immunization and other records, and, if applicable, a copy of the pupil’s plan adopted pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) or individualized education program adopted pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).

(f) The local educational agency shall assign the duties listed in this section to a person who is competent to handle the transfer procedure and who is aware of the specific educational recordkeeping needs of homeless, foster, and other transient children who transfer between schools.

(g) The local educational agency shall ensure that, if the pupil in foster care is absent from school due to a decision to change the
 placement of a pupil made by a court or placing agency, the grades and credits of the pupil will be calculated as of the date the pupil left school and no lowering of grades will occur as a result of the absence of the pupil under these circumstances.

(h) The local educational agency shall ensure that, if the pupil in foster care is absent from school due to a verified court appearance or related court ordered activity, no lowering of the pupil’s grades will occur as a result of the absence of the pupil under these circumstances.

(i) (1) A complaint of noncompliance with the requirements of this section may be filed with the local educational agency under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section
 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a local educational agency may appeal the decision to the department pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, and shall receive a written decision regarding the appeal within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal.

(3) If a local educational agency finds merit in a complaint, or if the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, the local educational agency shall provide a remedy to the affected pupil.

(4) Information regarding the requirements of this section shall be included in the annual notification distributed to, among
 others, pupils, parents or guardians of pupils, employees, and other interested parties pursuant to Section 4622 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(j) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “County placing agency” means a county social services department or county probation department.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, a county office of education, a charter school participating as a member of a special education local plan area, or a special education local plan area.

(3) “Pupil in foster care” has the same meaning as “foster
 child,” as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 48853.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 918, Sec. 2.   (SB 532)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49069.7.

(a) Parents of currently enrolled or former pupils have an absolute right to access to any and all pupil records related to their children that are maintained by school districts or private schools. The editing or withholding of any of those records, except as provided for in this chapter, is prohibited.

(b) Each school district shall adopt procedures for the granting of requests by parents for copies of all pupil records pursuant to Section 49065, or to inspect and review records during regular school hours, provided that the requested access shall be granted no later than five business days following the date of the request. Procedures shall include the notification to the parent of the location of all official pupil
 records if not centrally located and the availability of qualified certificated personnel to interpret records if requested.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 49069 by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 67.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Rights of Parents [49070. - 49072.]

49070.

Following an inspection and review of a pupil’s records, the parent or guardian of a pupil or former pupil of a school district may challenge the content of any pupil record.

(a) The parent or guardian of a pupil may file a written request with the superintendent of the school district to correct or remove any information recorded in the pupil’s written records
 that the parent or guardian alleges to be any of the following:

(1) Inaccurate.

(2) An unsubstantiated personal conclusion or inference.

(3) A conclusion or inference outside of the observer’s area of competence.

(4) Not based on the personal observation of a named person with the time and place of the observation noted.

(5) Misleading.

(6) In violation of the privacy or other rights of the pupil.

(b) (1) Within
 30 days of receipt of a request pursuant to subdivision (a), the superintendent or the superintendent’s designee shall meet with the parent or guardian and the certificated employee who recorded the information in question, if any, and if the employee is presently employed by the school district. The superintendent shall then sustain or deny the allegations.

(2) If the superintendent sustains any or all of the allegations,
 the superintendent shall order the correction or the removal and destruction of the information. However, in accordance with Section 49066, the superintendent shall not order a pupil’s grade to be changed unless the teacher who determined the grade is, to the extent practicable, given an opportunity to state orally, in writing, or both, the reasons for which the grade was given and is, to the extent practicable, included in all discussions relating to the changing of the grade.

(3) If the superintendent denies any or all of the allegations and refuses to
 order the correction or the removal of the information, the parent or guardian may, within 30 days of the refusal, appeal the decision in writing to the governing board of the school district.

(c) (1) Within 30 days of receipt of an appeal pursuant to subdivision (b), the governing board shall, in closed session with the parent or guardian and the certificated employee who recorded the information in question, if any, and if the employee is presently employed by the school district, determine whether or not to sustain or deny the allegations.

(2) If the governing board sustains any or all of the allegations, it shall order the superintendent to immediately correct or remove and destroy the information from the written records of the pupil, and inform the parent or guardian in writing. However, in accordance with Section 49066, the governing board shall not order a pupil’s grade to be changed unless the teacher who determined the grade is, to the extent practicable, given an opportunity to state orally, in writing, or both, the reasons for which the grade was given and is, to the extent practicable, included in all discussions relating to the changing of the grade.

(3) The decision of the governing board shall be final.

(4) Records of these administrative proceedings shall be maintained in a confidential manner and shall be destroyed one year after the decision of the governing board, unless the parent or guardian initiates legal proceedings relative to the disputed information within the prescribed period.

(5) (A) If the superintendent or governing board of the school district sustains the parent’s or guardian’s request to change the name, gender, or both, of a pupil or former pupil, the school district shall add a new document to the pupil’s or former pupil’s record that includes all of the following information:

(i) The date of the request.

(ii) The date the requested records were corrected.

(iii) A list of the
 records that the parent or guardian of the pupil or former pupil requested to be corrected.

(iv) The type of documentation, if any, provided by the parent or guardian of the pupil or former pupil to demonstrate a legal change to the pupil’s or former pupil’s name, gender, or both. The parent or guardian of the pupil or former pupil is not required to provide documentation of a legal change to the pupil’s or former pupil’s name, gender, or both.

(v) The name of the employee that completed the request.

(vi) The corrected and former names, genders, or both, of the pupil or former pupil.

(B) Notwithstanding paragraph (4), the document generated pursuant to subparagraph (A) regarding a parent’s or guardian’s request to change a pupil’s or former pupil’s name, gender, or both, shall be indefinitely maintained in a confidential manner.

(d) If the final decision of the governing board is unfavorable to the parent or guardian, or if the parent or guardian accepts an unfavorable decision by the superintendent of the school district,
 the parent or guardian shall be informed and shall have the right to submit a written statement of the parent’s or guardian’s objections to the information. This statement shall become a part of the pupil’s school record until the information objected to is corrected or removed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 179, Sec. 2.   (AB 711)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

49071.

(a) To assist in making determinations pursuant to Section 49070, a district superintendent or governing board may convene a hearing panel composed of the following persons, provided that the parent has given written consent to release information from the relevant pupil’s records to the members of the panel so convened:

(1) The principal of a public school other than the public school at which the record is on file.

(2) A certificated employee appointed by the chairman of the certificated employee council of the district, or, if no such council exists, a certificated employee appointed by the parent.

(3) A parent appointed by the superintendent or by the governing board of the district, depending upon who convenes the panel.

(b) The persons appointed pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) shall, if possible, not be acquainted with the pupil, his parent or guardian, or the certificated employee who recorded the information, except when the parent or guardian appoints the person pursuant to paragraph (2).

(c) The principal appointed to the hearing panel shall serve as its chairman. 

(d) The hearing panel shall, in closed session, hear the objections to the information of the parent and the testimony of the certificated employee who recorded the information in question, if any, and if such employee is presently employed by the school district.

The hearing panel shall be provided with verbatim copies of the information which is the subject of the controversy.

Written findings shall be made setting forth the facts and decisions of the panel, and such findings shall be forwarded to the superintendent or the governing board, depending upon who convened the panel.

The proceedings of the hearing shall not be disclosed or discussed by panel members except in their official capacities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

49072.

Whenever there is included in any pupil record information concerning any disciplinary action taken by school district personnel in connection with the pupil, the school district maintaining such record or records shall allow the pupil’s parent to include in such pupil record a written statement or response concerning the disciplinary action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Privacy of Pupil Records [49073. - 49079.7.]

49073.

(a) School districts shall adopt a policy identifying those categories of directory information as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 49061 that may be released. The school district shall determine which individuals, officials, or organizations may receive directory information. However, no information may be released to a private profitmaking entity other than employers, prospective employers, and representatives of the news media, including, but not limited to, newspapers, magazines, and radio and television stations. The names and addresses of pupils enrolled in grade 12 or who have terminated enrollment before graduation may be provided to a private school or college operating under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 94800) of Part 59 of
 Division 10 of Title 3 or its authorized representative. However, no such private
 school or college shall use that information for other than purposes directly related to the academic or professional goals of the institution, and a violation of this provision is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). In addition, the privilege of the private school or college to receive the information shall be suspended for a period of two years from the time of discovery of the misuse of the information. Any school district may limit or deny the release of specific categories of directory information to any public or private nonprofit organization based upon a determination of the best interests of pupils.

(b) Directory information may be released according to local policy as to any pupil or former pupil. However, notice shall be given at least on an annual basis
 of the categories of information that the school district plans to release and of the recipients. Directory information shall not be released regarding a pupil if a parent of that pupil has notified the school district that the information shall not be released.

(c) (1) Directory information shall not be released regarding a pupil identified as a homeless child or youth, as defined in paragraph (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), unless a parent, or pupil accorded parental rights, as identified in the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g), has provided written consent that directory information may be released.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding
 paragraph (1), directory information of a pupil identified as a homeless child or youth, as defined in paragraph (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)) may be disclosed, as authorized by school district policy in accordance with subdivision (a), to facilitate an eye examination by a nonprofit eye examination provider authorized by Section 49455.5, or a free oral health assessment hosted by schools as authorized by Section 49452.8, unless the parent or pupil accorded parental rights, as identified in the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g), has provided written notice to the school that they do not consent to the physical
 examination pursuant to Section 49451, subdivision (b) of, or subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of, Section 49452.8, or subdivision (f) of Section 49455.

(B) Directory information disclosed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall only be disclosed for the purpose of facilitating an eye examination by a nonprofit eye examination provider authorized by Section 49455.5, or a free oral health assessment hosted by schools as authorized by Section 49452.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 163, Sec. 1.   (AB 677)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

49073.1.

(a) A local educational agency may, pursuant to a policy adopted by its governing board or, in the case of a charter school, its governing body, enter into a contract with a third party for either or both of the following purposes:

(1) To provide services, including cloud-based services, for the digital storage, management, and retrieval of pupil records.

(2) To provide digital educational software that authorizes a third-party provider of digital educational software to access, store, and use pupil records in accordance with the contractual provisions listed in subdivision (b).

(b) A local
 educational agency that enters into a contract with a third party for purposes of subdivision (a) shall ensure the contract contains all of the following:

(1) A statement that pupil records continue to be the property of and under the control of the local educational agency.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a description of the means by which pupils may retain possession and control of their own pupil-generated content, if applicable, including options by which a pupil may transfer pupil-generated content to a personal account.

(3) A prohibition against the third party using any information in the pupil record for any purpose other than those required or specifically permitted by the contract.

(4) A description of the procedures by which a parent,
 legal guardian, or eligible pupil may review personally identifiable information in the pupil’s records and correct erroneous information.

(5) A description of the actions the third party will take, including the designation and training of responsible individuals, to ensure the security and confidentiality of pupil records. Compliance with this requirement shall not, in itself, absolve the third party of liability in the event of an unauthorized disclosure of pupil records.

(6) A description of the procedures for notifying the affected parent, legal guardian, or eligible pupil in the event of an unauthorized disclosure of the pupil’s records.

(7) (A) A certification that a pupil’s records shall not be retained or available to the third party upon completion of the terms of the contract and a
 description of how that certification will be enforced.

(B) The requirements provided in subparagraph (A) shall not apply to pupil-generated content if the pupil chooses to establish or maintain an account with the third party for the purpose of storing that content pursuant to paragraph (2).

(8) A description of how the local educational agency and the third party will jointly ensure compliance with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g).

(9) A prohibition against the third party using personally identifiable information in pupil records to engage in targeted advertising.

(c) In addition to any other penalties, a contract that fails to comply with the requirements of this section shall be rendered void if, upon
 notice and a reasonable opportunity to cure, the noncompliant party fails to come into compliance and cure any defect. Written notice of noncompliance may be provided by any party to the contract. All parties subject to a contract voided under this subdivision shall return all pupil records in their possession to the local educational agency.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Deidentified information” means information that cannot be used to identify an individual pupil.

(2) “Eligible pupil” means a pupil who has reached 18 years of age.

(3) “Local educational agency” includes school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools.

(4) “Pupil-generated content” means materials created by a pupil, including, but not limited to, essays, research reports, portfolios, creative writing, music or other audio files, photographs, and account information that enables ongoing ownership of pupil content. “Pupil-generated content” does not include pupil responses to a standardized assessment where pupil possession and control would jeopardize the validity and reliability of that assessment.

(5) (A) “Pupil records” means both of the following:

(i) Any information directly related to a pupil that is maintained by the local educational agency.

(ii) Any information acquired directly from the pupil through the use of instructional software or applications assigned to the pupil by a
 teacher or other local educational agency employee.

(B) “Pupil records” does not mean any of the following:

(i) Deidentified information, including aggregated deidentified information, used by the third party to improve educational products, for adaptive learning purposes, and for customizing pupil learning.

(ii) Deidentified information, including aggregated deidentified information, used to demonstrate the effectiveness of the operator’s products in the marketing of those products.

(iii) Deidentified information, including aggregated deidentified information, used for the development and improvement of educational sites, services, or applications.

(6) “Third party” refers to a provider
 of digital educational software or services, including cloud-based services, for the digital storage, management, and retrieval of pupil records.

(e) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the terms of a contract in effect before January 1, 2015, the provisions of this section shall not apply to the local educational agency or the third party subject to that agreement until the expiration, amendment, or renewal of the agreement.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose liability on a third party for content provided by any other third party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 386, Sec. 20.   (SB 436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

49073.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 49073, a local educational agency shall not
 include the directory information or the personal information of a pupil or of a parent or guardian of a pupil in the minutes of a meeting of its governing body, except as required by judicial order or federal law, if a pupil who is 18 years of age or older or a parent or guardian of a pupil has provided a written request to the secretary or clerk of the governing body to exclude his or her personal information or the name of his or her minor child from the minutes of a meeting of the governing body.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Directory information” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 49061.

(2) “Governing body” includes charter school governing bodies, county boards of education, and school district governing boards.

(3) “Local educational agency” includes charter schools, county offices of education, and school districts.

(4) “Personal information” includes a person’s address, telephone number, date of birth, and email address.

(c) This
 section is not intended to affect the public’s right of access to information pursuant to any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 788, Sec. 1.   (SB 1036)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

49073.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that a school district, in adopting a policy pursuant to Section 49073 governing the release of pupil directory information, not purposefully exclude any military services representative from access to that information. 

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature, in the interest of pupil confidentiality, that school districts minimize the release of pupil telephone numbers in the absence of express parental consent. The Legislature finds and declares that the nondisclosure of pupil telephone numbers will reduce the possibility of harassment of pupils and their families by organizations that receive pupil directory information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 299, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

49073.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Educational purposes” means for purposes that aid in instruction in the classroom or at home, or in classroom administration.

(2) (A) “Social media” means an electronic service or account, or electronic content, including, but not limited to, videos, still photographs, blogs, video blogs, podcasts, instant and text messages, email, online services or accounts, or Internet Web site profiles or locations.

(B) “Social media” shall not include an electronic service or account
 used exclusively for
 educational purposes or primarily to facilitate creation of school-sponsored publications, such as a yearbook or pupil newspaper, under the direction or control of a school, teacher, or yearbook adviser.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a school district, county office of education, or charter school that considers a program to gather or maintain in its records any information obtained from social media of any enrolled pupil shall notify pupils and their parents or guardians about the proposed program and provide an opportunity for public comment at a regularly scheduled public meeting of the governing board of the school district or county office of education, or governing body of the charter school, as applicable, before the adoption of the program. The notification required by this subdivision may be provided as part of the notification required pursuant to Section 48980.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 49062, a school district, county office of education, or charter school that adopts a program pursuant to subdivision (b) shall do all of the following:

(1) Gather or maintain only information that pertains directly to school safety or to pupil safety.

(2) Provide a pupil with access to any information about the pupil gathered or maintained by the school district, county office of education, or charter school that was obtained from social media, and an opportunity to correct or delete such information.

(3) (A) Destroy information gathered from social media and maintained in its records within one year after a pupil turns 18 years of age or within one year after the pupil is no longer enrolled in the school district, county office of education, or charter school, whichever occurs
 first.
